District of Columbia statutes.
38-1231.01

Biennial audits of UDC Endowment Fund.

Beginning February 1, 2001, the District of Columbia Auditor shall conduct biennial audits of the University of the District of Columbia’s Endowment Fund (“Fund”). The Auditor shall provide the Council with a report on the status of the Fund not later than February 1 of each year of the biennial audit.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2407, 47 DCR 6308

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization of biennial audits of endowment fund, see § 2407 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2407 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).